test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_ruonas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - mielgâs+v1: 
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: mielgâsân
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâsist
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: mielgâsáin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v1+N+Ess: mielgâsin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Par: mielgâsid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: mielgâseh
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: mielgâsij
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâsijd
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: mielgâsáid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâsijn
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: [mielgâsijguin, mielgâsijgijn]
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâsijttáá

  Noun - ruonâs+v1: 
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: ruonnâsân
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: ruonnâsist
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: ruonnâsáin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: ruonnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v1+N+Ess: ruonâsin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Par: ruonâsid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: ruonnâseh
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: ruonnâsij
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: ruonnâsijd
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: ruonnâsáid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: ruonnâsijn
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: [ruonnâsijguin, ruonnâsijgijn]
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: ruonnâsijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v1: 
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: suormâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: suormâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: suormâsân
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: suormâsist
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: suormâsáin
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: suormâsttáá
    suormâs+v1+N+Ess: suormâsin
    suormâs+v1+N+Par: suormâsid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: suormâseh
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: suormâsij
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: suormâsijd
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: suormâsáid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: suormâsijn
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: [suormâsijguin, suormâsijgijn]
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: suormâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v1: 
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Gen: siärvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Acc: siärvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Ill: siärvusân
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Loc: siärvusist
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Com: siärvusáin
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Abe: siärvusttáá
    siärvus+v1+N+Ess: siärvusin
    siärvus+v1+N+Par: siärvusid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Nom: siärvuseh
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Gen: siärvusij
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Acc: siärvusijd
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Ill: siärvusáid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Loc: siärvusijn
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Com: [siärvusijguin, siärvusijgijn]
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Abe: siärvusijttáá

  Noun - čiepâs: # ok, MLO
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čieppâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čieppâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čieppâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čieppâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čieppâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čieppâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čiepâsin, čieppâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čiepâsid, čieppâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čieppâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čieppâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čieppâsijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čieppâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čieppâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: [čieppâsijguin, čieppâsijgijn]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čieppâsijttáá

  Noun - mielgâs+v2: 
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mielgâsân
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâsist
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: mielgâsáin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v2+N+Ess: mielgâsin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Par: mielgâsid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mielgâseh
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mielgâsij
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâsijd
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mielgâsáid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâsijn
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: [mielgâsijguin, mielgâsijgijn]
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâsijttáá


  Noun - ruonâs+v2: 
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: ruonâsân
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: ruonâsist
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: ruonâsáin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: ruonnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v2+N+Ess: ruonâsin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Par: ruonâsid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: ruonâseh
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: ruonâsij
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: ruonâsijd
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: ruonâsáid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: ruonâsijn
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: [ruonâsijguin, ruonâsijgijn]
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: ruonâsijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v2: 
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suormâsân
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suormâsist
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: suormâsáin
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suormâsttáá
    suormâs+v2+N+Ess: suormâsin
    suormâs+v2+N+Par: suormâsid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suormâseh
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suormâsij
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suormâsijd
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suormâsáid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suormâsijn
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: [suormâsijguin, suormâsijgijn]
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suormâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v2: 
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Gen: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Acc: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Ill: siärvusân
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Loc: siärvusist
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Com: siärvusáin
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Abe: siärvusttáá
    siärvus+v2+N+Ess: siärvusin
    siärvus+v2+N+Par: siärvusid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Nom: siärvuseh
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Gen: siärvusij
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Acc: siärvusijd
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Ill: siärvusáid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Loc: siärvusijn
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Com: [siärvusijguin, siärvusijgijn]
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Abe: siärvusijttáá
